California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The compensation to be charged by and paid to any county for the performance of services under this article shall be fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors of the county and the board. The compensation shall in no event exceed one-half of 1 percent of all money collected for the district. The compensation collected by the county shall be placed to the credit of the county salary fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25903.

All taxes levied under this part are a lien on the property on which they are levied. Unless the board has by ordinance otherwise provided, the enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this part, so far as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

25904.

Whenever one or more special transit service districts are created and established pursuant to Chapter 10.5 (commencing at Section 27401), taxes in excess of one cent ($0.01) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation shall not thereafter be levied against any property not within the boundaries of a special transit service district, excepting, however, taxes sufficient to pay the principal or interest or both on any bonded indebtedness theretofore or thereafter incurred by a district as a whole. The creation of a special transit service district does not invalidate, in any manner, any taxes or assessments previously levied or assessed against any property of the
 district, either within or without the boundaries of a special transit service district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Claims [25951. - 25951.]

25951.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bonds [26201. - 26352.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance [26201. - 26212.]

26201.

A district may from time to time incur a bonded indebtedness as provided in this chapter to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing, or completing the whole or any portion of any transit facilities, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26202.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the public interest or necessity demands the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any transit facilities or any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, the cost of which will be too great to be paid out of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district, it may at any subsequent meeting of the board provide by ordinance for the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purpose set forth in the resolution to
 the voters of the district at a special bond election held for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26203.

In lieu of a resolution passed by the board, proceedings for the issuance of bonds for the purposes provided in this chapter may be initiated by petition of the voters of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26204.

Whenever any petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast is presented to the board asking for the acquisition, construction, or completion of the whole or any portion of any transit facilities or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, and also asking that a bonded indebtedness be incurred to pay for the cost thereof, the secretary of the district shall immediately examine and verify the signatures of the petition and certify the result of the examination to the
 board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26205.

If the required number of signatures is found to be genuine, the secretary shall transmit to the board an authentic copy of the petition without the signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26206.

Upon receiving a petition with the certificate of the secretary stating that it contains the required number of signatures, the board shall formulate for submission to the voters of the district at a special bond election called for that purpose the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purposes set forth in the petition. In its discretion the board may defer the calling of the election until the next general election to be held in the district in order to consolidate them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26207.

The ordinance calling a special bond election shall fix the date on which the election will be held, and the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against incurring the indebtedness. It shall also recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the transit facilities, works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property proposed to be acquired, constructed, or completed, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 6 percent per annum, payable semiannually or annually the
 first year and thereafter semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26208.

Propositions for incurring indebtedness for more than one object or purpose may be submitted at the same election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26209.

Any special bond election may be held separately, or may be consolidated with any other election authorized by law at which the voters of the district may vote. If a special bond election is consolidated with any other election, the provisions of this chapter setting forth the procedure for the calling and holding of the special bond election shall be complied with, except that the ordinance calling the election need not set forth the election precincts, polling places, and officers of election, but may provide that the precincts, polling places, and officers of election shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings calling the
 election with which the special bond election is consolidated, and shall refer to the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings by number and title, or by other definite description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26210.

The ordinance shall be published, and no other notice of election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26210.5.

The board shall comply with Article 3 (commencing with Section 9160) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, the provisions of which are applicable to any bond election held pursuant to this article. Wherever the words “county clerk” or “county elections official” appear in the Elections Code, the words “secretary of the board” shall be substituted, for the purposes of this article, and wherever the words “board of supervisors” appear in the Elections Code, the words “board of directors” shall be substituted, and wherever the words “district attorney or county counsel” appear in the Elections Code, the words “general counsel for the district” shall be substituted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 17.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

26211.

The votes of two-thirds of all the voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26212.

If the proposition submitted at a special bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the board shall not within six months after the election hold another special election for the submission of a proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness substantially the same as the proposition voted upon at the prior election unless a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast is filed with the board, requesting that the proposition, or a proposition substantially the same, be submitted at an election to be called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form and Content [26241. - 26244.]

26241.

Bonds authorized by this chapter shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board; except that payment shall begin not later than 10 years from the date thereof and shall be completed in not more than 50 years from that date.

The board may divide any issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter into two or more series, and may fix different dates of issuance and different maturity dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of each series shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board, and the board shall fix a date not more than 10 years from the date of issuance of each series for the earliest
 maturity of such series, and shall fix a date not more than 50 years from the date of issuance of each series for the final maturity of such series.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of bonds, a district may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, of any denomination whatsoever, with or without coupon, and in such form as may be prescribed by the board, to be exchanged for definitive bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

26242.

The bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board determines, except that no bonds shall be of a denomination less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor of a greater denomination than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or any multiple thereof, and shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in the bonds, and with interest at the rate specified therein, payable semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26243.

The board may at any time prior to the issuance and sale of any bonds provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity at not exceeding the par value and accrued interest plus a premium of not exceeding 5 percent upon the principal amount of the bonds, in which event the call price fixed by the board shall be set forth on the face of the bond. Notice of such redemption shall be published. If there is no newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, then the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the county in which
 the district or any part thereof is situated. The first publication shall be at least 30 days prior to the date fixed for the redemption. After the date fixed for such redemption interest on the bonds thereafter shall cease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

26244.

The bonds shall be signed by the president of the board or by such officer of the district as the board shall by resolution authorize and designate for that purpose. They shall also be signed by the treasurer, and be countersigned by the secretary. The coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and be signed by the treasurer. All signatures and countersignatures, except one of said signatures or countersignatures on the bonds, may be printed, lithographed, or engraved. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature is
 nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issue and Sale [26261. - 26263.]

26261.

The bonds may be issued and sold for not less than their par value, but otherwise as the board determines. Before selling any bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as the board may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either again give notice inviting bids or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26262.

All premiums and accrued interest received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds. The remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the district treasury to the credit of the proper fund, and shall be used exclusively for the objects or purposes for which the bonds were voted; provided that when said objects and purposes have been accomplished any moneys remaining shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds, and that when all principal of and interest on the bonds shall have been paid, any balance of money then remaining
 shall be transferred to the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26263.

In lieu of the immediate levy of a tax to pay the interest or any part thereof on any bonded indebtedness incurred in accordance with this division, the board may in the estimate of the amount of money necessary to be raised by the bonds include a sum sufficient to pay interest on all of the bonds or part thereof during the period of acquisition, construction, or completion, but for no period in excess of five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunding [26281. - 26287.]

26281.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the refunding of the whole or any portion of the bonded indebtedness will be of advantage to the district the board may refund the bonded indebtedness or any portion thereof and issue refunding bonds of the district therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26282.

The issuance of refunding bonds shall not be construed as the incurring or increase of an indebtedness within the meaning of this division, and the approval of the voters is not required for the issuance of refunding bonds. The board may provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity in the ordinance authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26283.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of this chapter shall substantially govern as to all matters pertaining to the issuance of refunding bonds, including and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the form, execution, issuance, maturity, redemption, refunding, validation, the payment of interest from bond funds, and the status of the bonds as investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26284.

Refunding bonds shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding the interest rate on the refunded bonds, but payment of the refunding bonds shall begin not later than one year from the date thereof and be completed in not more than 40 years from that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26285.

The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds shall be applied only to the purchase, or retirement at not more than par and accrued interest, or the call price, of the bonded indebtedness for which the refunding bonds were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26286.

In lieu of selling refunding bonds and using the proceeds to purchase or retire the bonds to be refunded, the board may exchange refunding bonds at not less than par and accrued interest for the bonds so refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26287.

Whenever outstanding bonds are refunded they shall be surrendered to the treasurer of the district, who shall cancel them by endorsing on their face the manner in which the refunding was effected (whether by exchange or purchase, and the amount for which so purchased, if any) and by perforating through each bond and each coupon attached thereto the word “canceled” together with the date of cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Status as Investments [26311. - 26312.]

26311.

All bonds including refunding bonds issued by a district are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State School Fund and for all sinking funds under the control of the State Treasurer. Whenever any money or funds may by law be invested in or loaned upon the security of bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts, in the State, such money or funds may be invested in or loaned upon the security of the bonds of a district; and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts by law may be used as security for
 the faithful performance or execution of any court or private trust or of any other act, bonds of the district may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26312.

All bonds of the district, to the same extent as bonds of any other municipality, are legal for use by any state or national bank or banks in the State as security for the deposit of funds of the State or of any county, city and county, city, municipality, or other public or municipal corporation within the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Validating Proceedings [26341. - 26341.]

26341.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1522.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue Bonds [26351. - 26352.]

26351.

As an alternative procedure for the raising of funds, a district created pursuant to this part is authorized to issue bonds, payable from revenues of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by a district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing at Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions of which are applicable to a district created pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

26352.

A district created pursuant to this part is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing at Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include transit facilities and any and all parts thereof and all additions, extensions and improvements thereto and all other facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed or completed by a district under this part. A district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for any one or more facilities or enterprises authorized to be acquired,
 constructed, or completed by a district or, in the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for the acquisition, construction and completion of any one of such facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent a district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the facilities or works authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the directors may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Annexation of Cities [26401. - 26551.]



  ARTICLE 1. Annexation Agreement [26401. - 26406.]

26401.

Any city not included within the boundaries of a district may be annexed thereto in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26402.

The legislative body of the city proposed to be annexed shall agree in writing with the board upon the terms and conditions of annexation, which agreement (among other things) may provide for the levy and collection of special taxes within the city in addition to the taxes elsewhere in this division provided for, the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere within the district, the incurring or assumption of indebtedness, or the making of a payment or payments, or the transfer of property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26403.

The annexation agreement may also provide that the city’s annexation to the district shall constitute annexation to any existing special transit service district. Approval of the annexation by the voters, pursuant to this chapter, if the annexation agreement includes provision for inclusion in a special transit service district, shall constitute full compliance with the provisions of Article 6 (commencing at Section 27461) of Chapter 10.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

26404.

As an alternative to commencement of annexation proceedings by action of the legislative body of a city, a petition signed by voters within the city proposed to be annexed, equal in number to at least ten (10) percent of the total vote cast, and asking that proceedings be taken for its annexation, may be addressed to the board and filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

26405.

The petition may include one or more separate documents, but each document shall contain the affidavit of the party who circulated it, certifying that each name signed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be. The secretary of the district shall compare the signatures on the petition with the affidavits of registration on file with the county elections official and if he or she finds that the petition has been signed by the required number of voters he or she shall attach his or her signature thereto and present the petition
 to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

26406.

If the board determines that the annexation of the city, whose voters have petitioned pursuant to Section 26404, would facilitate the acquisition or operation of any transit facilities for the district or be of advantage to the district, then the board shall also determine the terms and conditions upon which the annexation should be made. The terms and conditions of annexation shall be embodied in an annexation agreement. The annexation agreement may provide (among other things) for any or all of the items set forth in Sections 26402 and 26403.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Approval by District [26421. - 26427.]

26421.

The agreement shall become effective and be binding upon the district and the city when approved in the manner set forth in this chapter.

The board shall by ordinance setting forth the agreement at length declare its intention of causing it to be executed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26422.

The ordinance, together with a notice fixing the time and place for hearing thereon, shall be published in the district pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. The time fixed for the hearing shall be not less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of the publication of the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

26423.

At the hearing any person interested may file with the board written objections to the execution of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26424.

Upon the hearing the board shall determine whether or not the agreement will be carried into execution and shall hear and determine all objections thereto. Failure of any person interested in the district or in the matter of the proposed execution of the agreement to show cause in writing pursuant to Section 25423 constitutes an assent on his part to a change in the boundaries of the district and to the execution of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26425.

Any hearing on the agreement may be adjourned from time to time by the board without further notice other than an order to be entered upon the minutes of the meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26426.

If no protests are filed or if the protests filed are overruled and denied the board shall thereupon by resolution finally approve the agreement and authorize its execution, which shall become effective when executed by the city, duly authorized in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26427.

When executed by the district the agreement shall be dated and an executed copy filed with the secretary of the district. An executed copy shall also be filed with the clerk of the city to be annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Approval by City [26451. - 26456.]

26451.

At any time after the board has finally approved the agreement of annexation the legislative body of the city to be annexed shall cause an election to be held in the city to determine whether the city will be annexed to the district upon the terms and conditions stated in the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26452.

Notice of election shall be published as provided in Section 24533 and shall either state that a copy of the annexation agreement is on file in the office of the secretary or clerk of the city proposed to be annexed, and open to the inspection of all persons interested, or set forth the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation at length, in the discretion of the legislative body calling the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26453.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition shall set forth the proposition of annexation substantially as follows: Shall the _______ (city) be annexed to _______ transit district in accordance with and subject to all of the terms and conditions of an agreement
 of annexation dated _______ now on file in the office of the clerk of _______ (city)?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26454.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were cast in favor of the annexation, the proposition and all of the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters; except that if the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation provide for the assumption of any indebtedness of the district by any city proposed to be annexed, the proposition of annexation shall not be deemed carried unless approved by the vote of two-thirds of all the voters voting on the proposition at the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26455.

If the proposition fails to carry, the result shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26456.

If the proposition receives the vote of the requisite majority of voters the governing body of the city shall enter in its minutes an order declaring the result of the election and shall thereupon cause the agreement of annexation to be executed by its duly authorized officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishment of Annexation [26486. - 26486.]

26486.

Upon receipt by the district of a copy of the agreement of annexation properly executed by the district and the city proposed to be annexed the board shall pass a resolution declaring the city annexed to the district, and shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be filed with the Secretary of State. From and after the date of filing of the resolution with the Secretary of State the annexation of the city to the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Annexation of Territory to Cities [26511. - 26512.]

26511.

Upon the completion of the annexation of any territory in accordance with law to any city included or partially included in the district, the city clerk shall file with the secretary of the district a certified copy of the ordinance, resolution or other document completing said annexation, containing a description of the territory so annexed. Unless the district within 90 days after such filing shall file with the city clerk the district’s written objections to the annexation to the district of said territory or portion thereof, such territory, or portion thereof, not objected to by the district shall, upon the termination of such period be deemed incorporated into and
 annexed to the district, and thereafter is subject to taxation, along with the entire territory of the district in accordance with the assessable valuation of the property thereof, for general district purposes, and for the payment of any indebtedness theretofore or thereafter incurred by the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

26512.

If the district shall file its objections in the manner aforesaid to the annexation to the district of such territory or portion thereof, the territory, or portion thereof, shall not be annexed to the district except in the manner provided in Articles 1 (commencing with Section 26401), 2 (commencing with Section 26421), 3 (commencing with Section 26451) and 4 ( commencing with Section 26486) of this chapter. The district may withdraw such objections by filing with the city clerk a certified copy of a resolution of the board stating that such objections are withdrawn. Thereupon said territory, or portion thereof, shall be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the
 district as provided in Section 26511.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Effect of Annexation [26531. - 26532.]

26531.

From and after the date of annexation the board shall levy upon all of the property in the city annexed such taxes, tolls, or charges as are necessary to provide funds for the payment of the indebtedness assumed by the city or otherwise necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the annexation agreement, all in addition to the general district taxes authorized elsewhere in this division to be levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26532.

No annexation of a city to a district shall operate to dissolve or terminate the legal existence of the city annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Contest of Annexation [26551. - 26551.]

26551.

The validity of any proceedings for the annexation of any city to any district shall not be contested in any action unless the action is brought within three months after the completion of the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Annexation of Unincorporated Territory [26651. - 27111.]



  ARTICLE 1. Annexation Agreement [26651. - 26658.]

26651.

Unincorporated territory may be annexed to a district in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26652.

Unincorporated territory not contiguous to a district may not be annexed if the district does not possess facilities for supplying transit service to that territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26653.

A petition signed by voters within the territory proposed to be annexed equal in number to at least 10 percent of the total vote cast, describing the territory and asking that proceedings be taken for its annexation, shall be addressed to the board and filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

26654.

The secretary shall compare the signatures on the petition with the affidavits of registration on file with the county elections official and if he or she finds that the petition has been signed by the required number of voters he or she shall attach his or her signature thereto and present the petition to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

26655.

If the board determines that the annexation of the territory would facilitate the acquisition or operation of any transit facilities for the district, or be of advantage to the district, then the board shall also determine the terms and conditions upon which the annexation should be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26656.

Provisions may be made (among other things) for payment of taxes within the territory to be annexed in addition to the taxes elsewhere in this part provided for, the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere within the district, the incurring or assumption of indebtedness, or the making of a payment or payments, or the transfer of property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the territory proposed to be annexed. The boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed need not be coterminous with any election precincts. The terms and conditions shall become effective and be binding upon the district and the
 territory to be annexed when approved in the manner set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

26657.

The annexation agreement may also provide that the unincorporated territory’s annexation to the district shall constitute annexation to any existing special transit service district. Approval of the annexation by the voters, pursuant to this chapter, if the agreement includes provision for inclusion in a special transit service district, shall constitute full compliance with the provisions of Article 6 (commencing at Section 27461) of Chapter 10.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

26658.

As an alternative to commencement of annexation proceedings by a petition by the voters within any unincorporated territory, proposed to be annexed, the legislative body of an unincorporated territory may agree in writing upon the terms and conditions of annexation, which agreement may contain (among other things) provisions as set forth in Sections 26656 and 26657.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Approval by District [26681. - 26687.]

26681.

The board shall by ordinance setting forth the terms and conditions at length declare its intention of causing the agreement to be approved by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26682.

The ordinance together with a notice fixing the time and place for hearing thereon shall be published in the district pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. A copy of the ordinance shall be filed with the secretary of the district. The time fixed for hearing shall not be less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of the publication of the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

26683.

At the hearing any person interested may file with the board written objections to the approval of the terms and conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26684.

Upon the hearing the board shall determine whether or not the terms and conditions will be approved and shall hear and determine all objections thereto. Failure of any person interested in the district or in the matter of the proposed annexation on the terms and conditions set forth in the ordinance to show cause in writing pursuant to Section 26683 constitutes an assent on his part to a change in the boundaries of the district upon the terms and conditions set forth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26685.

Any hearing on the agreement may be adjourned from time to time by the board, not exceeding 30 days in all, without further notice other than an order entered upon the minutes of the meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26686.